District of Columbia statutes.
9-111.31

Reporting requirements.

(a)

On November 1st of each year, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a report on all District of Columbia Highway Trust Fund and Local Transportation Fund expenditures for the previous fiscal year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)

The number and location of each street, alley, sidewalk, curb, gutter and streetlight renovated, repaired, or maintained during the past fiscal year; and

(2)

The amount of the expenditure for each project.

(b)

Repealed.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1704, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 3602, 49 DCR 6968
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 623, 50 DCR 5668
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 41, 51 DCR 881
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, §§ 84(f), 91, 52 DCR 2638
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 624, 58 DCR 1008
Law 14-190, in subsec. (b), substituted “November 1st” for “February 1st”.
D.C. Law 15-39 deleted the subsection designation (a); and repealed subsec. (b). Prior to repeal, subsec. (b) had read as follows: “(b) On November 1st of each year, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a plan for the use of all funds in the Highway Trust Fund and Local Roads Construction and Maintenance Fund for the upcoming fiscal year.”
D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (b), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 18-370, in subsec. (a), substituted “District of Columbia Highway Trust Fund and Local Transportation Fund” for “Highway Trust Fund and Local Roads Construction and Maintenance Fund”.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1604 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 623 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 623 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 624 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
Short title of title XXXVI of Law 14-190: Section 3601 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title XXXVI of the act may be cited as the Highway Trust Fund Amendment Act of 2002.
Section 629 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 629. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2011; except, that sections 622 and 623(a)(2) shall apply as of the effective date of this act.”